Mississippi, session 2026, SB2636.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Department of Cybersecurity Act." SECTION 2. (1)  There is hereby created the Mississippi Department of Cybersecurity. (2)  The department shall be responsible for defending and securing cyberspace by leading statewide efforts to drive and enable effective cyber defense, resilience of state critical functions and a robust technology ecosystem in Mississippi. SECTION 3.  The Governor shall appoint an Executive Director of the Department of Cybersecurity with the advice and consent of the Senate and in accordance with standards established by the State Personnel Board.  The executive director shall serve at the will and pleasure of the Governor.  The salary of the executive director shall be set by the Governor, subject to the approval of the State Personnel Board, and shall be provided for out of any funds made available for such purpose by the Legislature, the federal government or other gifts or grants.  The executive director shall be responsible to the Governor for the proper administration of the programs of cybersecurity provided for under this act in conformity with the policies adopted by the Governor and shall be responsible for appointing directors of offices and any necessary supervisors, assistants and employees.  The salary and compensation of such employees shall be subject to the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the State Personnel Board as created under Section 25-9-101 et seq.  The executive director shall be the State Cybersecurity Director with such authority and responsibility as is prescribed by law. SECTION 4. The Department of Cybersecurity shall provide the cyber security services authorized by law, and in carrying out the purposes of this act, the department is authorized: (a)  To expend funds received either by appropriation or directly from federal or private sources; (b)  To develop and implement a comprehensive strategy for protecting digital systems, networks and information from threats; (c)  To prevent attacks, detect intrusions, respond to incidents, manage vulnerabilities and build cyber defense capabilities for the state; (d)  To use best practices for developing and coordinating cybersecurity efforts, including data-driven and trackable cyber defense strategies; (e)  To coordinate with state and local agencies, departments and organizations to collaborate and enhance cybersecurity practices; (f)  To maintain an educational awareness program for the citizens of the state to encourage and increase the usage of cybersecurity best practices; (g)  To enter into contracts and other agreements with state and local agencies, departments, commissions, organizations or other similar entities for the purpose of developing stronger cybersecurity systems throughout the state.  The Department of Cybersecurity, in conjunction with the formulation of cybersecurity strategies, may require that local entities enter into agreements with the authority as a condition for receiving any state grants to enhance cybersecurity; and (h)  All other action deemed necessary and appropriate to effectuate the duties prescribed to the department by this act. SECTION 5.  In carrying out his or her duties under this act, the Executive Director of the Department of Cybersecurity: (a)  Shall establish appropriate subordinate administrative units within the department; (b)  Shall prepare and submit to the Governor and the Legislature annual reports of activities and expenditures and, before each regular session of the Legislature, coordinate budget requests required for carrying out this act and estimates of the amounts to be made available for this purpose from all sources; (c)  Shall be empowered to exercise executive and administrative supervision over all offices, programs and services now existing or hereafter acquired or created under the jurisdiction of the department; (d)  Shall take such other action as he or she deems necessary or appropriate to effectuate the purposes of this act; (e)  May delegate to any officer or employee of the department such of his or her powers and duties as he or she finds necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. SECTION 6. (1)  There is created a special fund in the State Treasury to be known as the Department of Cybersecurity Fund which shall consist of monies from grants, gifts, state appropriations and federal funds designated for deposit into the fund.  Monies in the fund may be used by the Department of Cybersecurity for the purpose of effectuating the purpose prescribed to the department by this act, upon appropriation from the Legislature. Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. (2)  The Department of Cybersecurity shall have all powers necessary to implement and administer the provisions of this section. SECTION 7. The Department of Finance and Administration, the Department of Information Technology and the State Personnel Board shall have the powers necessary in carrying out the creation of the Mississippi Department of Cybersecurity required by this act. SECTION 8.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed on June 30, 2026.